Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.140

Transactions between state agencies—Procedures for payments through transfers upon accounts.

The director of financial management may establish procedures whereby some or all payments between state agencies may be made by transfers upon the accounts of the state treasurer in lieu of making such payments by warrant or check. Such procedures, when established, shall include provision for corresponding entries to be made in the accounts of the affected agencies.

[ 1979 c 151 s 46; 1969 ex.s. c 61 s 2.]